apertium-hin.hin.dix
    <pardef n="चल__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="रह__vaux_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="कराह"><i>कराह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="घट"><i>घट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जूझ"><i>जूझ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="टिक"><i>टिक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="निपट"><i>निपट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बदल"><i>बदल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रूठ"><i>रूठ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सरक"><i>सरक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="बैठ"><i>बैठ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कर रह"><i>कर<b/>रह</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रह"><i>रह</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जा रह"><i>जा<b/>रह</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कर सक"><i>कर<b/>सक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="हो सक"><i>हो<b/>सक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सक"><i>सक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जा सक"><i>जा<b/>सक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="हो चुक"><i>हो<b/>चुक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="चुक"><i>चुक</i><par n="रह__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सूख"><i>सूख</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ठिठक"><i>ठिठक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चमक"><i>चमक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जल"><i>जल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उड़"><i>उड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="फौंछ"><i>फौंछ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उग"><i>उग</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चटक"><i>चटक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="घट"><i>घट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="मुढ"><i>मुढ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
 	<e lm="फफक"><i>फफक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ह्ँस"><i>ह्ँस</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बुछुड़"><i>बुछुड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खड़ख़आ"><i>खड़ख़आ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="घटना-बढ"><i>घटना-बढ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="छलक"><i>छलक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="निर्णायक बन"><i>निर्णायक<b/>बन</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="वापस लौट"><i>वापस<b/>लौट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिल्लाकर बोल"><i>चिल्लाकर<b/>बोल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रस निकल"><i>रस<b/>निकल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="में चढ"><i>में<b/>चढ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भाग आ"><i>भाग<b/>आ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सरपट भाग"><i>सरपट<b/>भाग</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="टोपी पहन"><i>टोपी<b/>पहन</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="से गुजर"><i>से<b/>गुजर</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कोयला भर"><i>कोयला<b/>भर</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जारी रह"><i>जारी<b/>रह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दरार पड़"><i>दरार<b/>पड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="क्रिकेट खेल"><i>क्रिकेट<b/>खेल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="नीचे उतर"><i>नीचे<b/>उतर</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दूर रह"><i>दूर<b/>रह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="मंच छोड़"><i>मंच<b/>छोड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="अनाहार रह"><i>अनाहार<b/>रह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="दमक उठ"><i>दमक<b/>उठ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="अन्दर बह"><i>अन्दर<b/>बह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आगे चल"><i>आगे<b/>चल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="अचानक आ"><i>अचानक<b/>आ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="साथ चल"><i>साथ<b/>चल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आगे बढ"><i>आगे<b/>बढ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चमक उठ्"><i>चमक<b/>उठ्</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="नाक घुसेड़"><i>नाक<b/>घुसेड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="फीका पड़"><i>फीका<b/>पड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="आगे बढ"><i>आगे<b/>बढ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ज़हर डाल"><i>ज़हर<b/>डाल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="परिणाम निकाल"><i>परिणाम<b/>निकाल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="परिणाम निकाल"><i>परिणाम<b/>निकाल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उपर उठ"><i>उपर<b/>उठ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उत्तरोत्तर बढ"><i>उत्तरोत्तर<b/>बढ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="उल्टी आ"><i>उल्टी<b/>आ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पिता बन"><i>पिता<b/>बन</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
